vim/st.aff
FLAG long
SFX pN Y 43
SFX pN valoir valoir/ valoir
SFX pN valoir valant/ valoir
SFX pN valoir vaux/ valoir
SFX pN valoir vaut/ valoir
SFX pN valoir valons/ valoir
SFX pN valoir valez/ valoir
SFX pN valoir valent/ quivaloir
SFX pN valoir valent/ révaloir
SFX pN valoir valais/ valoir
SFX pN valoir valait/ valoir
SFX pN valoir valions/ valoir
SFX pN valoir valiez/ valoir
SFX pN valoir valaient/ valoir
SFX pN valoir valus/ valoir
SFX pN valoir valut/ valoir
SFX pN valoir valûmes/ valoir
SFX pN valoir valûtes/ valoir
SFX pN valoir valurent/ valoir
SFX pN valoir vaudrai/ valoir
SFX pN valoir vaudras/ valoir
SFX pN valoir vaudra/ valoir
SFX pN valoir vaudrons/ valoir
SFX pN valoir vaudrez/ valoir
SFX pN valoir vaudront/ valoir
SFX pN valoir vaudrais/ valoir
SFX pN valoir vaudrait/ valoir
SFX pN valoir vaudrions/ valoir
SFX pN valoir vaudriez/ valoir
SFX pN valoir vaudraient/ valoir
SFX pN valoir vaille/ quivaloir
SFX pN valoir vale/ révaloir
SFX pN valoir vailles/ quivaloir
SFX pN valoir vales/ révaloir
SFX pN valoir vaillent/ quivaloir
SFX pN valoir valusse/ valoir
SFX pN valoir valusses/ valoir
SFX pN valoir valût/ valoir
SFX pN valoir valussions/ valoir
SFX pN valoir valussiez/ valoir
SFX pN valoir valussent/ valoir
SFX pN valoir vaux/ valoir
SFX pN valoir valons/ valoir
SFX pN valoir valez/ valoir

SFX pO Y 17
SFX pO valoir valoir/ revaloir
SFX pO valoir valant/ revaloir
SFX pO valoir valu/ revaloir
SFX pO valoir valus/ revaloir
SFX pO valoir value/ revaloir
SFX pO valoir values/ revaloir
SFX pO valoir vaudrai/ revaloir
SFX pO valoir vaudras/ revaloir
SFX pO valoir vaudra/ revaloir
SFX pO valoir vaudrons/ revaloir
SFX pO valoir vaudrez/ revaloir
SFX pO valoir vaudront/ revaloir
SFX pO valoir vaudrais/ revaloir
SFX pO valoir vaudrait/ revaloir
SFX pO valoir vaudrions/ revaloir
SFX pO valoir vaudriez/ revaloir
SFX pO valoir vaudraient/ revaloir

SFX pP Y 2
SFX pP paroir paroir/ comparoir
SFX pP paroir parant/ comparoir

SFX pQ Y 2
SFX pQ haloir haloir/ chaloir
SFX pQ haloir haut/ chaloir

SFX pR Y 2
SFX pR pparoir pparoir/ apparoir
SFX pR pparoir ppert/ apparoir

SFX pS Y 137
SFX pS oir oir/ oir
SFX pS sseoir sseyant/ seoir
SFX pS ssoir sseyant/ soir
SFX pS sseoir ssoyant/ seoir
SFX pS ssoir ssoyant/ soir
SFX pS sseoir ssis/ seoir
SFX pS sseoir ssise/ seoir
SFX pS sseoir ssises/ seoir
SFX pS ssoir ssis/ soir
SFX pS ssoir ssise/ soir
SFX pS ssoir ssises/ soir
SFX pS sseoir ssieds/ seoir
SFX pS sseoir ssied/ seoir
SFX pS sseoir sseyons/ seoir
SFX pS sseoir sseyez/ seoir
SFX pS sseoir sseyent/ seoir
SFX pS sseoir ssois/ seoir
SFX pS sseoir ssoit/ seoir
SFX pS sseoir ssoyons/ seoir
SFX pS sseoir ssoyez/ seoir
SFX pS sseoir ssoient/ seoir
SFX pS ssoir ssieds/ soir
SFX pS ssoir ssied/ soir
SFX pS ssoir sseyons/ soir
SFX pS ssoir sseyez/ soir
SFX pS ssoir sseyent/ soir
SFX pS ssoir ssois/ soir
SFX pS ssoir ssoit/ soir
SFX pS ssoir ssoyons/ soir
SFX pS ssoir ssoyez/ soir
SFX pS ssoir ssoient/ soir
SFX pS sseoir sseyais/ seoir
SFX pS sseoir sseyait/ seoir
SFX pS sseoir sseyions/ seoir
SFX pS sseoir sseyiez/ seoir
SFX pS sseoir sseyaient/ seoir
SFX pS sseoir ssoyais/ seoir
SFX pS sseoir ssoyait/ seoir
SFX pS sseoir ssoyions/ seoir
SFX pS sseoir ssoyiez/ seoir
SFX pS sseoir ssoyaient/ seoir
SFX pS ssoir sseyais/ soir
SFX pS ssoir sseyait/ soir
SFX pS ssoir sseyions/ soir
SFX pS ssoir sseyiez/ soir
SFX pS ssoir sseyaient/ soir
SFX pS ssoir ssoyais/ soir
SFX pS ssoir ssoyait/ soir
SFX pS ssoir ssoyions/ soir
SFX pS ssoir ssoyiez/ soir
SFX pS ssoir ssoyaient/ soir
SFX pS sseoir ssis/ seoir
SFX pS sseoir ssit/ seoir
SFX pS sseoir ssîmes/ seoir
SFX pS sseoir ssîtes/ seoir
SFX pS sseoir ssirent/ seoir
SFX pS ssoir ssis/ soir
SFX pS ssoir ssit/ soir
SFX pS ssoir ssîmes/ soir
SFX pS ssoir ssîtes/ soir
SFX pS ssoir ssirent/ soir
SFX pS sseoir ssiérai/ seoir
SFX pS sseoir ssiéras/ seoir
SFX pS sseoir ssiéra/ seoir
SFX pS sseoir ssiérons/ seoir
SFX pS sseoir ssiérez/ seoir
SFX pS sseoir ssiéront/ seoir
SFX pS sseoir ssoirai/ seoir
SFX pS sseoir ssoiras/ seoir
SFX pS sseoir ssoira/ seoir
SFX pS sseoir ssoirons/ seoir
SFX pS sseoir ssoirez/ seoir
SFX pS sseoir ssoiront/ seoir
SFX pS ssoir ssiérai/ soir
SFX pS ssoir ssiéras/ soir
SFX pS ssoir ssiéra/ soir
SFX pS ssoir ssiérons/ soir
SFX pS ssoir ssiérez/ soir
SFX pS ssoir ssiéront/ soir
SFX pS ssoir ssoirai/ soir
SFX pS ssoir ssoiras/ soir
SFX pS ssoir ssoira/ soir
SFX pS ssoir ssoirons/ soir
SFX pS ssoir ssoirez/ soir
SFX pS ssoir ssoiront/ soir
SFX pS sseoir ssiérais/ seoir
SFX pS sseoir ssiérait/ seoir
SFX pS sseoir ssiérions/ seoir
SFX pS sseoir ssiériez/ seoir
SFX pS sseoir ssiéraient/ seoir
SFX pS sseoir ssoirais/ seoir
SFX pS sseoir ssoirait/ seoir
SFX pS sseoir ssoirions/ seoir
SFX pS sseoir ssoiriez/ seoir
SFX pS sseoir ssoiraient/ seoir
SFX pS ssoir ssiérais/ soir
SFX pS ssoir ssiérait/ soir
SFX pS ssoir ssiérions/ soir
SFX pS ssoir ssiériez/ soir
SFX pS ssoir ssiéraient/ soir
SFX pS ssoir ssoirais/ soir
SFX pS ssoir ssoirait/ soir
SFX pS ssoir ssoirions/ soir
SFX pS ssoir ssoiriez/ soir
SFX pS ssoir ssoiraient/ soir
SFX pS sseoir sseye/ seoir
SFX pS sseoir sseyes/ seoir
SFX pS sseoir ssoie/ seoir
SFX pS sseoir ssoies/ seoir
SFX pS ssoir sseye/ soir
SFX pS ssoir sseyes/ soir
SFX pS ssoir ssoie/ soir
SFX pS ssoir ssoies/ soir
SFX pS sseoir ssisse/ seoir
SFX pS sseoir ssisses/ seoir
SFX pS sseoir ssît/ seoir
SFX pS sseoir ssissions/ seoir
SFX pS sseoir ssissiez/ seoir
SFX pS sseoir ssissent/ seoir
SFX pS ssoir ssisse/ soir
SFX pS ssoir ssisses/ soir
SFX pS ssoir ssît/ soir
SFX pS ssoir ssissions/ soir
SFX pS ssoir ssissiez/ soir
SFX pS ssoir ssissent/ soir
SFX pS sseoir ssieds/ seoir
SFX pS sseoir sseyons/ seoir
SFX pS sseoir sseyez/ seoir
SFX pS sseoir ssois/ seoir
SFX pS sseoir ssoyons/ seoir
SFX pS sseoir ssoyez/ seoir
SFX pS ssoir ssieds/ soir
SFX pS ssoir sseyons/ soir
SFX pS ssoir sseyez/ soir
SFX pS ssoir ssois/ soir
SFX pS ssoir ssoyons/ soir
SFX pS ssoir ssoyez/ soir
